ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC周辺機器 > 携帯端末・PDA周辺機器 > 電子書籍リーダー周辺機器: 電子書籍リーダー用ケース; 電子書籍リーダー用チャーム・ダストプラグ; 電子書籍リーダー用グリップ・ホルダー; 電子書籍リーダー用インサート; 電子書籍リーダー用スキン; 電子書籍リーダー用スリーブ; 電子書籍リーダー用ストラップ
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių priedai > Delninių įrenginių priedai > Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų priedai: Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų dėklai; Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų pakabukai ir dulkių kištukai; Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų laikikliai ir rankenos; Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų įdėklai; Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų plėvelės; Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų įmautės; Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų dirželiai
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítače – příslušenství > Přenosná zařízení – příslušenství > Čtečky elektronických knih – příslušenství: Pouzdra na čtečky elektronických knih; Ozdoby a zátky do e-book čteček; Úchyty a držáky na e-book čtečky; Vložky do e-book čteček; Obaly na e-book čtečky; Pouzdra na e-book čtečky; Řemínky na e-book čtečky
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datortillbehör > Tillbehör till handhållna enheter > Tillbehör till e-boksläsare: Fodral till e-boksläsare; E-bokläsarsmycken och dammpluggar; E-bokläsargrepp och hållare; E-bokläsarinlägg; E-bokläsarskal; E-bokläsarfodral; E-bokläsarremmar
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-kiegészítők > Kézieszköz-kiegészítők > E-könyv-olvasó-kiegészítők: E-könyv-olvasó-tokok; E-könyv-olvasó díszek és porvédő dugók; E-könyv-olvasó fogók és tartók; E-könyv-olvasó betétek; E-könyv-olvasó borítások; E-könyv-olvasó tokok; E-könyv-olvasó pántok
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Acessórios de computador > Acessórios de dispositivo portátil > Acessórios de leitor de E-Book: Capas de leitor de E-Book; Berloques e protetores de poeira para e-book reader; Pegas e suportes para e-book reader; Inserções para e-book reader; Skins para e-book reader; Capas para e-book reader; Correias para e-book reader
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện máy tính > Phụ kiện thiết bị cầm tay > Phụ kiện thiết bị đọc sách ebook: Hộp đựng máy đọc sách ebook; Lô cung và cắm bụi đầu đọc sách; Tay cầm và giá đỡ đầu đọc sách; Lót đầu đọc sách; Da đầu đọc sách; Túi đầu đọc sách; Dây đeo đầu đọc sách
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์คอมพิวเตอร์ > อุปกรณ์สำหรับเครื่องมือถือ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องอ่านอีบุ๊ก: เคสเครื่องอ่านอีบุ๊ก; จี้ห้อยและที่อุดฝุ่นสำหรับเครื่องอ่านหนังสืออิเล็กทรอนิกส์; ที่จับและที่ยึดเครื่องอ่านหนังสืออิเล็กทรอนิกส์; แผ่นรองในสำหรับเครื่องอ่านหนังสืออิเล็กทรอนิกส์; สกินสำหรับเครื่องอ่านหนังสืออิเล็กทรอนิกส์; ซองใส่เครื่องอ่านหนังสืออิเล็กทรอนิกส์; สายสะพายเครื่องอ่านหนังสืออิเล็กทรอนิกส์
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeraccessoires > Accessoires voor handheldapparaten > Accessoires voor e-boeklezers: Hoezen voor e-boeklezers; E-reader bedels en stofstoppers; E-reader grips en houders; E-reader inzetstukken; E-reader skins; E-reader sleeves; E-reader riemen
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ υπολογιστών > Αξεσουάρ φορητών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ συσκευών ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων: Θήκες συσκευών ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων; Διακοσμητικά και τάπες για συσκευές ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων; Λαβές και βάσεις για συσκευές ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων; Ενθέματα για συσκευές ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων; Skins για συσκευές ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων; Θήκες για συσκευές ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων; Λουράκια για συσκευές ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonetarvikkeet > Mobiililaitteiden lisätarvikkeet > E-kirjanlukijan lisätarvikkeet: E-kirjanlukijan kotelot; E-lukijan korut ja pölytulpat; E-lukijan pidikkeet ja kahvat; E-lukijan sisäkkeet; E-lukijan suojapinnat; E-lukijan suojakuoret; E-lukijan hihnat
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerzubehör > Zubehör für E-Book-Reader & Handheld-Computer > Zubehör für E-Book-Reader: E-Book-Reader-Taschen; E-Book-Reader-Charms und -Staubstecker; E-Book-Reader-Griffe und -Halter; E-Book-Reader-Einlagen; E-Book-Reader-Skins; E-Book-Reader-Hüllen; E-Book-Reader-Riemen
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Accesorii calculatoare > Accesorii pentru dispozitive portabile > Accesorii pentru cititoare de cărți electronice: Huse pentru cititoare de cărți electronice; Brelocuri și dopuri de praf pentru cititoare electronice; Mânere și suporturi pentru cititoare electronice; Inserții pentru cititoare electronice; Skinuri pentru cititoare electronice; Huse pentru cititoare electronice; Curele pentru cititoare electronice
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Dodatna oprema za računala > Pribor za ručne uređaje > Pribor za e-čitače: Maskice za e-čitače; Privjesci i zaštita od prašine za e-čitače; Držači za e-čitače; Umeci za e-čitače; Folije za e-čitače; Navlake za e-čitače; Remeni za e-čitače
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Tilbehør til datamaskiner > Tilbehør for håndholdte enheter > Tilbehør for E-boklesere: Etuier til E-boklesere; Charms og støvplugger til e-bokleser; Grep og holdere til e-bokleser; E-bokleser-innlegg; Trekk til e-bokleser; E-bokleser-etuier; E-bokleser-stropper
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Aksesuarları > Elde Taşınabilir Cihaz Aksesuarları > E-Kitap Okuyucu Aksesuarları: E-Kitap Okuyucu Kılıfları; E-kitap Okuyucu Takıları ve Toz Tıkaçları; E-kitap Okuyucu Tutamakları ve Tutucuları; E-kitap Okuyucu Ekleri; E-kitap Okuyucu Kaplamaları; E-kitap Okuyucu Kılıfları; E-kitap Okuyucu Askıları
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Accessori per computer > Accessori dispositivi portatili > Accessori E-Book reader: Custodie E-Book reader; Fascette e tappi antipolvere del lettore e-book; Impugnature e supporti del lettore e-book; Insertos del lettore e-book; Pelli del lettore e-book; Custodie del lettore e-book; Cinghie del lettore e-book
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Accessoires pour ordinateurs > Accessoires pour appareils mobiles > Accessoires pour liseuses: Housses pour liseuses; Breloques et bouchons anti-poussière pour liseuse; Poignées et supports pour liseuse; Inserts pour liseuse; Habillages pour liseuse; Housses pour liseuse; Sangles pour liseuse
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 부대용품 > 휴대용 기기 부대용품 > 전자책 단말기 부대용품: 전자책 단말기 케이스; 전자책 리더 참 및 먼지 플러그; 전자책 리더 그립 및 홀더; 전자책 리더 인서트; 전자책 리더 스킨; 전자책 리더 슬리브; 전자책 리더 스트랩
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Accessories > Handheld Device Accessories > E-Book Reader Accessories: E-Book Reader Cases; E-Book Reader Charms & Dust Plugs; E-Book Reader Grips & Holders; E-Book Reader Inserts; E-Book Reader Skins; E-Book Reader Sleeves; E-Book Reader Straps
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Acessórios para computadores > Acessórios para dispositivos portáteis > Acessórios do leitor de e-book: Estojos para leitor de e-book; Pingentes e plugues de proteção para e-reader; Empunhadores e suportes para e-reader; Capas internas para e-reader; Skins para e-reader; Capas para e-reader; Alças para e-reader
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Akcesoria komputerowe > Akcesoria do palmtopów > Akcesoria do czytników e-booków: Futerały na czytniki e-booków; Zawieszki i zatyczki przeciwkurzowe do czytników e‑booków; Gripy i uchwyty do czytników e‑booków; Wkładki do czytników e‑booków; Okleiny (skiny) na czytniki e‑booków; Pokrowiec (rękaw) na czytnik e‑booków; Paski do czytników e‑booków
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Accesorios informáticos > Accesorios para dispositivos portátiles > Accesorios para lectores de libros electrónicos: Estuches para lectores de libros electrónicos; Adornos y tapones antipolvo para lector de libros electrónicos; Asideros y soportes para lector de libros electrónicos; Insertos para lector de libros electrónicos; Protectores para lector de libros electrónicos; Fundas para lector de libros electrónicos; Correas para lector de libros electrónicos
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo pre ručné zariadenia > Príslušenstvo k čítačke elektronických kníh: Puzdrá na čítačky elektronických kníh; Ozdoby a zátky prachu čítačiek e-kníh; Gripy a držiaky čítačiek e-kníh; Vložky čítačiek e-kníh; Nálepky čítačiek e-kníh; Púzdra čítačiek e-kníh; Remienky čítačiek e-kníh
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computer – tilbehør > Håndholdt enhed – tilbehør > E-bogslæser – tilbehør: E-bogslæser – cover; E-bogslæser – vedhæng og støvpropper; E-bogslæser – greb og holdere; E-bogslæser – indlæg; E-bogslæser – skins; E-bogslæser – sleeves; E-bogslæser – stropper
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦配件 > 手持裝置配件 > 電子書閱讀器配件: 電子書閱讀器護套; 電子書閱讀器吊飾與防塵塞; 電子書閱讀器握把與支架; 電子書閱讀器內襯; 電子書閱讀器機身貼; 電子書閱讀器保護套; 電子書閱讀器背帶
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机配件 > 手持装置配件 > 电子书阅读器配件: 电子书阅读器套; 电子书阅读器挂饰和防尘塞; 电子书阅读器握把和支架; 电子书阅读器内衬; 电子书阅读器贴膜; 电子书阅读器保护套; 电子书阅读器背带
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни аксесоари > Аксесоари за преносими устройства > Аксесоари за електронни четци: Калъфи за електронни четци; Висулки и капачета за прах за електронни четци; Дръжки и държачи за електронни четци; Вложки за електронни четци; Обвивки за електронни четци; Калъфи за електронни четци; Каишки за електронни четци
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniška oprema > Dodatki za ročne naprave > Dodatki za bralnike e-knjig: Ovitki za bralnike e-knjig; Obeski in zamaški za e-bralce; Ročaji in držala za e-bralce; Vložki za e-bralce; Ovitki za e-bralce; Torbice za e-bralce; Trakovi za e-bralce
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные аксессуары > Аксессуары для портативных устройств > Аксессуары для электронных книг: Чехлы для электронных книг; Подвески и пылезащитные заглушки для электронных книг; Ручки и держатели для электронных книг; Вкладыши для электронных книг; Наклейки для электронных книг; Чехлы для электронных книг; Ремешки для электронных книг